Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
ARTICLE 22
PSYCHIATRIC HOSPITAL

Section

23-22-101. Psychopathic hospital and laboratory.

There shall be established in this state a hospital under the name and title of the "psychopathic hospital and laboratory of the university of Colorado". This hospital shall be established at Denver.

Source:

L. 19:

p. 568, § 1.

C.L.

§ 594.

CSA:

C. 105, § 59.

CRS 53:

§ 124-3-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-3-1.

23-22-102. Name of hospital changed.

The institution within the university of Colorado, known and designated under the name and title of the "psychopathic hospital and laboratory of the university of Colorado" by section 23-22-101, after July 1, 1967, shall be designated under the name and title of the "university of Colorado psychiatric hospital". The legal effect of any statute prior to July 1, 1967, designating such hospital by any other name or property rights acquired and obligations incurred prior to said date under any other name shall not be impaired hereby.

Source:

L. 67:

p. 556, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-3-18.

23-22-103. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Hospital" or "psychiatric hospital" means the university of Colorado psychiatric hospital.

Source:

L. 23:

p. 524, § 1.

CSA:

C. 105, § 67.

CRS 53:

§ 124-3-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-3-2.

23-22-104. Control and management of hospital.

Unless the assets of the university of Colorado psychiatric hospital are transferred, pursuant to section 23-21-506 (1)(a), to the university of Colorado hospital authority operating university hospital, the board of regents of the university of Colorado shall have full control and supervision of all the property and grounds and buildings of the hospital and shall have the entire government and management of the same. It shall prescribe and publish all rules, regulations, and bylaws for the management of the affairs of the hospital and of its patients and for the government of its officers and employees. The board shall make proper provisions for the reception, treatment, discharge, and transfer either from or to other institutions or from the hospital to family care and the return therefrom of all patients who may be committed to the hospital.

Source:

L. 19:

p. 569, § 4.

C.L.

§ 597.

CSA:

C. 105, § 62.

CRS 53:

§ 124-3-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-3-3.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 1003, § 3, effective October 1.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 586, § 5, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section was amended in House Bill 89-1143, enacted by the General Assembly at its first regular session in 1989, as a conforming amendment necessitated by the authorization for the operation of the university of Colorado university hospital by a nonprofit-nonstock corporation. The Colorado Supreme Court subsequently declared House Bill 89-1143 unconstitutional in its entirety. See

Colorado Association of Public Employees v. Board of Regents,

804 P.2d 138 (Colo. 1990). Senate Bill 91-225, enacted by the General Assembly at its first regular session in 1991, authorized the operation of university hospital by a newly created university of Colorado hospital authority. Since the previous act was declared unconstitutional in its entirety, the General Assembly elected to make a similar conforming amendment to this section in Senate Bill 91-225. For further explanation of the circumstances surrounding the enactment of Senate Bill 91-225, see the legislative declaration contained in section 1 of chapter 99, Session Laws of Colorado 1991.

23-22-105. Control of hospital - director.

The board of regents has full power to accept legacies, bequests, devises, and donations for the benefit of the psychiatric hospital and to apply the same to the furtherance of the purposes of said hospital, to the end that these benefits may accrue to the greatest possible extent to the afflicted citizens of this state.

The director of said hospital shall serve as professor of psychiatry in the school of medicine of the university of Colorado.

Source:

L. 23:

p. 524, § 2.

CSA:

C. 105, § 68.

CRS 53:

§ 124-3-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-3-4.

23-22-106. Director and assistant.

The board of regents shall appoint a director who holds office during its pleasure, who is a physician and graduate of an incorporated medical college, who has had at least ten years' experience in the actual practice of his or her profession, and who has had at least five years' actual experience as a neuropathologist. The director shall reside at the hospital, give his or her entire time and attention to the discharge of his or her official duties, and receive compensation as fixed by the board of regents. The board of regents may further provide for an assistant director who is a physician and graduate of an incorporated medical college, has had at least five years' experience in the actual practice of his or her profession, and one year's specialization in behavioral or mental health disorders. It shall provide for other employees and medical assistants as may be necessary and prescribe their duties and fix their respective compensations. The director shall select and appoint all such assistants and employees, subject to the approval of the board of regents. The assistants and employees hold their positions subject to the rules of the board of regents.

Source:

L. 19:

p. 570, § 6.

C.L.

§ 599.

CSA:

C. 105, § 64.

CRS 53:

§ 124-3-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-3-5.

L. 2017:

Entire section amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1319, § 173, effective May 25.

Cross references:

(1) For rule-making procedures, see article 4 of title 24.

(2) For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.

23-22-107. Objects of hospital - eligible patients.

The hospital is primarily and principally conducted, not for chronic illness, but for the care and treatment of legal residents of Colorado who are afflicted with a behavioral or mental health disorder that can probably be remedied by observation, treatment, and hospital care. The hospital must also be utilized for such instruction and for such scientific research as, in the opinion of the board of regents, will promote the welfare of the patients committed or certified to its care and assist in the application of science to the prevention and cure of behavioral or mental health disorders.

Persons eligible to admission to said hospital as patients shall belong to one of the following classes: First, voluntary public patients; second, committed public patients; third, voluntary private patients; fourth, committed private patients; fifth, part pay patients, either voluntary or committed.

A voluntary public patient is one who is admitted to the hospital at his own request or at the request of the person who has lawful custody or control over him. A committed patient is one who is ordered by the court to submit to observation, care, and treatment at the hospital. A private patient is one whose entire expenses at the hospital are paid by himself, out of his estate, by those responsible for his support, or by some person who voluntarily assumes the expense. A public patient is one whose entire expense at the hospital is paid out of the psychiatric hospital fund. A part pay patient is one whose expense is paid in part out of the psychiatric hospital fund, and the remainder is paid by himself, out of his estate, by those legally responsible for his support, or by someone who voluntarily assumes the expense.

Source:

L. 23:

p. 525, § 3.

CSA:

C. 105, § 69.

CRS 53:

§ 124-3-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-3-6.

L. 2017:

(1) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1320, § 174, effective May 25.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.

23-22-108. Voluntary private patients.

Voluntary private patients may be admitted in accordance with regulations to be established by the board of regents of the university of Colorado, and their care, nursing, observation, treatment, medicine, maintenance, and other expenses shall be without expense to the state. However, the charge for such care, nursing, observation, treatment, medicine, maintenance, and other expenses shall not exceed the actual per diem cost of the same as determined by the board of regents. An advance deposit for the expenses of voluntary private patients shall be required at all times.

Source:

L. 23:

p. 532, § 7.

CSA:

C. 105, § 73.

CRS 53:

§ 124-3-13.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-3-7.

23-22-109. Control over voluntary patients.

If any person has been admitted to the hospital as a voluntary patient, the director of the hospital has the same authority and control over the patient as if the patient had been admitted by order of court; except that a voluntary patient must not be detained against the patient's will or that of the person having legal custody or control over the patient for more than ten days unless the hospital director has within such interval obtained an order of certification for the patient.

Source:

L. 23:

p. 532, § 8.

CSA:

C. 105, § 74.

CRS 53:

§ 124-3-14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-3-8.

L. 2020:

Entire section amended, (SB 20-136), ch. 70, p. 284, § 10, effective September 14.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 20-136, see section 1 of chapter 70, Session Laws of Colorado 2020.

23-22-110. Deposit of moneys collected.

All sums collected from patients in said hospital shall be deposited in the psychiatric hospital fund.

Every person received as a patient at the psychiatric hospital, whether certified, committed, or otherwise, and the estate of such person and of all persons responsible for the patient's support are liable for the cost of the inquisition, certification, commitment, transportation, and hospital expenses.

The expenses of the proceedings, commitment, and transportation to the hospital may be recovered by the county bearing such expenses, and the expenses of observation, treatment, and hospital care and of transportation and attendance of any discharged patient from said hospital to any point within the state to which he may be discharged, insofar as they remain unpaid, may be collected by the attorney general for the board of regents. The statutes of limitations shall not run against the obligations for these items. All moneys so collected by the attorney general shall be placed in the psychiatric hospital fund.

Source:

L. 23:

p. 538, § 16.

CSA:

C. 105, § 82.

CRS 53:

§ 124-3-20.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-3-9.

L. 2020:

(2) amended, (SB 20-136), ch. 70, p. 284, § 11, effective September 14.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 20-136, see section 1 of chapter 70, Session Laws of Colorado 2020.

23-22-111. Reorganization of university hospital - effect. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 89:

Entire section added, p. 1005, § 10, effective October 1.

L. 91:

(2) added by revision, p. 589, §§ 14, 15.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section upon the repeal of part 1 of article 21 of this title. Said part 1 was repealed, effective October 1, 1991. (See L. 91, p. 589.)